Louisiana, session 2026, SB294.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 27:44(15), 205(16), and 353(9) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§44. Definitions
When used in this Chapter, the following terms shall mean:
* * *
(15) "Net gaming proceeds" means the total of all cash and property,
including checks received by a licensee, whether collected or not, received by the
licensee from gaming operations, less the total of all cash paid out as winnings to
patrons and five million dollars annually directly attributable to promotional play
wagers. A licensee may assign all or part of the amount of the allowable
deduction directly attributable to promotional wagers that is not claimed by the
licensee for the same fiscal year to another licensee licensed pursuant to
Chapters 4, 5, and 7 of this Title. The assignment shall be in writing and both
the licensee assigning the deduction and the licensee to which the deduction is
assigned shall report the assignment to the Louisiana Gaming Control Board.
* * *
§205. Definitions
When used in this Chapter, the following terms have these meanings:
* * *
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 294 ENROLLED
(16) "Gross revenue" means the total of all value received by the casino
gaming operator from gaming operations, including cash, checks, vouchers,
instruments and anything received in payment for credit extended to a patron for
purposes of gaming, and compensation received for conducting any game in which
the casino gaming operator is not party to a wager, less the total of all value or
amounts paid out as winnings to patrons and credit instruments or checks which are
uncollected as determined by rule of the corporation and five million dollars
annually directly attributable to promotional play wagers. The casino gaming
operator may assign all or part of the amount of the allowable deduction
directly attributable to promotional wagers that is not claimed by the casino
gaming operator for the same fiscal year to another licensee licensed pursuant
to Chapters 4 and 7 of this Title. The assignment shall be in writing and both
the casino gaming operator assigning the deduction and the licensee to which
the deduction is assigned shall report the assignment to the Louisiana Gaming
Control Board.
* * *
§353. Definitions
When used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have these meanings:
* * *
(9) "Net slot machine proceeds" means the total of all cash and property
received by a licensee from slot machine gaming operations minus the amount of
cash or prizes paid to winners and five million dollars annually directly attributable
to promotional play wagers. A licensee may assign all or part of the amount of the
allowable deduction directly attributable to promotional wagers that is not
claimed by the licensee for the same fiscal year to another licensee licensed
pursuant to Chapters 4, 5, and 7 of this Title. The assignment shall be in writing
and both the licensee assigning the deduction and the licensee to which the
deduction is assigned shall report the assignment to the Louisiana Gaming
Control Board.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 294 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval by the legislature or July 1, 2026, whichever is later.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.